SpellChecking/SpellCheckingTests/bin/Debug/Dictionaries/chuvash.aff
SFX A ă пушăн/RS [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пă
SFX A ă рушăн/RS [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рă
SFX A ă сушăн/RS [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сă
SFX A ă çушăн/RS [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çă
SFX A ă тушăн/RS [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тă
SFX A ă хушăн/RS [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хă
SFX A ă чушăн/RS [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чă
SFX A ă шушăн/RS [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шă
SFX A ă вăршăн/RS [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вă
SFX A ă кăршăн/RS [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кă
SFX A ă лăршăн/RS [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лă
SFX A ă мăршăн/RS [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мă
SFX A ă нăршăн/RS [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нă
SFX A ă пăршăн/RS [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пă
SFX A ă рăршăн/RS [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рă
SFX A ă сăршăн/RS [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сă
SFX A ă çăршăн/RS [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çă
SFX A ă тăршăн/RS [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тă
SFX A ă хăршăн/RS [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хă
SFX A ă чăршăн/RS [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чă
SFX A ă шăршăн/RS [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шă
SFX A ă шăн/RS [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ă
SFX A 0 ршăн/RS [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ă
SFX A 0 ĕшĕн/RT [^аăут]
SFX A т чĕшĕн/RT т
SFX A а ишĕн/RT а
SFX A у ăвĕшĕн/RT у
SFX A ă вишĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вă
SFX A ă кишĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кă
SFX A ă лишĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лă
SFX A ă мишĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мă
SFX A ă нишĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нă
SFX A ă пишĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пă
SFX A ă ришĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рă
SFX A ă сишĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сă
SFX A ă çишĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çă
SFX A ă тишĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тă
SFX A ă хишĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хă
SFX A ă чишĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чă
SFX A ă шишĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шă
SFX A ă ишĕн/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ă
