SpellChecking/SpellCheckingTests/bin/Debug/Dictionaries/chuvash.dic
çăпата/A
çу/AH
çурт/A
ăвăслăх/A
ăнăçлăх/A
ăншăрт/A
ăрых/A
ăстăн/A
ĕçтăвком/A
Адлер/A
Акçан/A
Алдан/A
Альтаçка/A
Андриан/A
Аппак/A
Арнольд/A
Атмулла/A
Ачук/A
Батор/A
Берлин/A
Борисоглебск/A
Ваçутка/A
Вартук/A
Венедикт/A
Виндзор/A
Водолей/A
Вюрцбург/A
Геленджик/A
Гименей/A
Гук/A
Данилович/A
Джозеф/A
Доплер/A
Екав/A
Ернечук/A
Жорж/A
Зиновьевич/A
Иксак/A
Ильмăрса/A
Индианаполис/A
Иркутск/A
Итапай/A
Кăтярикка/A
Казахстан/A
Каньук/A
Касьян/A
Кипр/A
Комсомольск/A
Красноармейск/A
Культюк/A
Ланкастер/A
Ливан/A
Львов/A
Мăхамат/A
Макăл/A
Маркуç/A
Медногорск/A
Микуш/A
Минук/A
Митук/A
Молоткин/A
Мускав/A
Натюк/A
Нефтеюганск/A
Новосибирск/A
Нямук/A
Орлеан/A
Паççук/A
Пайпăлат/A
Пантелеймон/A
Пекин/A
Петюк/A
Пимулла/A
Питтсбург/A
Подольск/A
Пурай/A
Рим/A
Рубен/A
Саватар/A
Салантай/A
Саранск/A
Сахвун/A
Североморск/A
Серентюк/A
Сеттюк/A
Симăрса/A
Ситул/A
Спасск/A
Судан/A
Таймас/A
Тевеслу/A
Тимай/A
Томск/A
Туйпăлат/A
Туркменистан/A
Удалов/A
Улюкка/A
Урюпинск/A
Ухтюк/A
Филиппович/A
Хĕрчук/A
Хертук/A
Хусан/A
Чулхула/A
Шерихва/A
Эверест/A
Элтетук/A
Эптюш/A
Юлианович/A
Якушка/A
Ярмук/A
Яхха/A
абрикос/A
аванпорт/A
авиаприбор/A
автан/A
автоматизм/A
авторлăх/A
агитпроп/A
адресант/A
айăпланакан/A
акăш/A
аккомпаниатор/A
акционер/A
алимент/A
алтăр/A
альтиметр/A
аммонал/A
анализ/A
анилин/A
ант/A
антифашист/A
апартеид/A
аппаратчик/A
арабист/A
аркану/A
арсăр/A
архиепископ/A
асăх/A
аскăнлăх/A
астролог/A
атлант/A
аул/A
ацетилен/A
аэроçуна/A
бак/A
бальзам/A
барабан/A
батист/A
белорус/A
библиофил/A
битум/A
болт/A
бояр/A
бриллиант/A
будильник/A
бумеранг/A
бюро/A
вăльтьăркка/A
вăрмансăрлăх/A
вакă/A
вандализм/A
васкавçă/A
велодром/A
вертолёт/A
вибратор/A
висмут/A
волан/A
вулавçă/A
вутлăх/A
вырсарникун/A
гангстерлăх/A
гастроном/A
генералиссимус/A
гермошлем/A
гидролог/A
гитлеровец/A
гориичнăй/A
градусник/A
гренадёр/A
гудрон/A
дачник/A
декабрист/A
демонстратор/A
детерминизм/A
диалог/A
диктор/A
диск/A
догматизм/A
домен/A
драмкружок/A
еврей/A
жезл/A
завод/A
закусочнăй/A
затон/A
зефир/A
идеал/A
изолятор/A
имажинизм/A
инвестор/A
инкассатор/A
интервент/A
ипподром/A
йăвалăх/A
йăлма/A
йăпăлтавçă/A
йăсăр/AE
йод/A
йышлăх/A
кăкăр/A
кăлчак/A
кăмпаçă/A
кăркăс/A
кăтай/A
кăшкăру/A
кабала/A
каварлăх/A
казначей/A
калăмçă/A
каллиграф/A
кальмар/A
канăçу/A
кантăкçă/A
капан/A
каппай/A
карçинкка/A
каратэ/A
кардиограф/A
каротаж/A
картонаж/A
каскă/A
кастрат/A
катмар/A
качă/A
каю/A
квинтет/A
кий/A
киноартист/A
киноэкран/A
класлăх/A
клипсă/A
кокаин/A
коллоквиум/A
комбайнёр/A
коммерсант/A
компостер/A
конгрессмен/A
конспиратор/A
контрастлăх/A
кооператив/A
кормозапарник/A
космополит/A
кофейник/A
кредит/A
криминалист/A
ксерокс/A
кузов/A
кулак/A
культурăсăрлăх/A
кункăрашка/A
купол/A
курант/A
курсант/A
куст/A
кушук/A
лăрккаш/A
лавсан/A
ламаизм/A
ланчашка/AE
лапта/A
латă/A
легионер/A
лектор/A
ливер/A
линкор/A
литмонтаж/A
логик/A
лояллăх/A
лутрамас/A
мăйкăч/A
мăкарич/A
мăриккан/A
мăшкăллăх/A
магнит/A
майорат/A
маккар/A
мамăкçă/A
манер/A
маринад/A
мартен/A
мастеровой/A
матяр/A
меджлис/A
мелник/A
металлист/A
метранпаж/A
микрорайон/A
миллионер/A
митинг/A
молниеотвод/A
монтёр/A
моторист/A
мукка/A
мунчала/AH
мухмăр/A
нăйкăшу/A
най/A
нар/A
наставниклăх/A
начкамас/A
неологизм/A
новатор/A
нумизмат/A
обой/A
океан/A
онколог/A
опыт/A
ординатор/A
ответлăх/A
очерк/A
пăлхану/A
пăравус/A
пăрчăкан/A
пăтрашу/A
пăшалçă/A
падишах/A
паккус/A
палисадник/A
памятник/A
пантеизм/A
парабеллум/A
параппанçă/A
парник/A
партнёр/A
пассив/A
патриотлăх/A
паххăр/A
педсовет/A
передатчик/A
пессимист/A
пилон/A
пируэт/A
планировщик/A
плебей/A
повидло/A
подпоручик/A
полигон/A
полицмейстер/A
понтон/A
посланник/A
правăлăх/A
предлог/A
приемник/A
принц/A
приёмнăй/A
продукт/A
промышленник/A
протест/A
проходной/A
пуçлăх/A
пукрас/A
пултăр/A
пунш/A
пурмис/A
пусмăр/A
путланкă/A
пушмак/A
пыркка/A
радикулит/A
радиотехник/A
райвоенком/A
ранет/A
ратник/A
реалист/A
ревтрибунал/A
режиссёр/A
реквием/A
ремонтник/A
ресторан/A
речитатив/A
романист/A
рулет/A
сăвăс/A
сăмах/A
сăпай/A
сăрнайçă/A
сабантуй/A
саванна/A
сакăлтак/A
салон/A
самолет/A
сановник/A
сапанкă/A
сарана/A
саступ/A
сахьян/A
связист/A
секстет/A
сенат/A
сестра/A
симбиоз/A
сионист/A
скипетр/A
скутер/A
смерд/A
советник/A
сортировщик/A
союз/A
спирт/A
стадион/A
статор/A
стенд/A
стоматолог/A
стрихнин/A
субъективист/A
сукмак/A
сулу/A
супă/A
суррогат/A
сухал/A
сывалу/A
сырлăх/A
сыхчă/A
тăварлăх/A
тăлăм/A
тăмпай/A
тăнсăрлăх/A
тăрăс/A
тăрна/A
тăхăм/A
тĕрĕсмарлăх/A
таврăну/A
таканкка/A
талай/A
тальк/A
танлаштару/A
тапкаç/A
тарантул/A
татулăх/A
тезис/A
телефон/A
терморегулятор/A
тиечук/A
товаровед/A
тореадор/A
трагик/A
трансформатор/A
трибун/A
трубач/A
туйăмсăр/A
тулливлаçлăх/A
тункăр/A
тупăшу/A
тур/A
турист/A
турчăка/A
тутар/A
тымарçимĕç/A
тытамак/A
уçă/AE
углерод/A
уйăх/A
уклад/A
улатакка/A
умсăмах/A
уплюнкка/A
урата/A
урхамах/A
усравкка/A
утопист/A
ученик/A
фаворит/A
фанатик/A
фасад/A
феодализм/A
фикус/A
финн/A
фокус/A
формат/A
фотокружок/A
фрахт/A
фургон/A
хăватлăх/A
хăлаç/A
хăмпăлчă/A
хăраманлăх/A
хăт/A
хăю/A
хаçат/A
хай/A
халап/A
ханлăх/A
харамса/A
хаяв/A
хна/A
христиан/A
художник/A
хун/A
хупанкă/A
хуралçă/A
хурта/A
хуткупăс/A
хушу/A
хыптармăш/A
хысна/A
ценз/A
циклотрон/A
чăкăлташу/A
чăмакка/A
чăрмавсăр/A
чăхăм/A
чалка/A
чарăнусăр/A
чашлама/A
чинавкка/A
чупу/A
чылайлăх/A
шăлан/A
шăнăр/A
шăплăх/A
шăрт/A
шабашник/A
шакăртма/A
шанăç/A
шапăлкка/A
шарлашка/A
шахмат/A
шевро/A
шкап/A
шнек/A
шпингалет/A
штат/A
штурмовик/A
шупашкар/A
шухăшлăх/A
шырав/A
ылма/A
ырлав/A
эдельвейс/A
экскурс/A
экспроприатор/A
электрокăмака/A
эликсир/A
эпигон/A
эскимо/A
этнограф/A
юлташ/A
юнионизм/A
юптару/A
юрма/A
юхăну/A
ядро/A
ямб/A
янташлăх/A
ярмуççи/A
яшлăх/A
